Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3710
Appointment of volunteer; procedure.

(1) A judge may appoint a court appointed special advocate volunteer in any proceeding brought pursuant to section 43-247 or 43-292 when, in the opinion of the judge, a child who may be affected by such proceeding requires services that a volunteer can provide and the court finds that the appointment is in the best interests of the child.

(2) A volunteer shall be appointed pursuant to a court order. The court order shall specify the volunteer as a friend of the court acting on the authority of the judge. The volunteer acting as a friend of the court may offer as evidence a written report with recommendations consistent with the best interests of the child, subject to all pertinent objections.

(3) A memorandum of understanding between a court and a court appointed special advocate program is required in any county where a program is established and shall set forth the roles and responsibilities of the court appointed special advocate volunteer.

(4) The volunteer's appointment shall conclude:

(a) When the court's jurisdiction over the child terminates;

(b) Upon discharge by the court on its own motion;

(c) With the approval of the court, at the request of the program director of the court appointed special advocate program to which the volunteer is assigned; or

(d) Upon successful motion of a party to the action for the removal of the volunteer because the party believes the volunteer has acted inappropriately, is unqualified, or is unsuitable for the appointment.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 33.